Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.190

Public stadium authority—Securing services—Service provider agreement—Resolutions setting procedures.

The public stadium authority may secure services by means of an agreement with a service provider. The public stadium authority shall publish notice, establish criteria, receive and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with respondents under requirements set forth by authority resolution.

[ 1997 c 220 s 118 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]